California statutes. Education Code
(8) If the application for disability is denied or canceled, a member who applies for a service retirement allowance under this section is subject to all of the following:

(A) Unless otherwise provided in this part, a member who, on their application for service retirement, elects an option pursuant to Section 24300.1 or 24307 may not change or revoke that option.

(B) If the member receives a modified service retirement allowance based on the election of an option pursuant to Section 24300.1
 or 24307, that modified service retirement allowance shall continue in effect and unchanged.

(C) If the member did not elect an option pursuant to Section 24300.1 or 24307 and receives an unmodified service retirement allowance, that unmodified service retirement allowance shall continue in effect and unchanged.

(b) A member who applies for service retirement under this section may change or cancel their service retirement application pursuant to Section 24204, or may terminate their service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208.

(c) A member may not cancel their application for disability prior to a determination of that application unless they submit a written request to the system. If a member elects to cancel
 their service retirement application or elects to terminate their service retirement allowance as described in subdivision (b), that election shall not cancel the application for disability.

(d) (1) Subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 24001 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24101 shall not apply to a member who cancels an application for service retirement pursuant to Section 24204 or who terminates a service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208, if all of the following apply:

(A) The member earned at least one year of credited service subsequent to the most recent terminated service retirement allowance.

(B) The member’s application for disability under this
 section is pending determination by the board.

(2) If the member’s application for disability under this section is denied or canceled, subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 24001 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24101 shall apply if the member submits a new application for disability.

(e) (1) If the board approves the application for disability, and notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 24204, the board shall cancel the member’s application for service retirement and shall authorize payment of a disability allowance or disability retirement.

(2) If the board approves the application for disability and the member has received service retirement allowance
 payments under this part, the effective date for the disability allowance or disability retirement shall be the same as the effective date of the service retirement allowance.

(f) If a member who applies for service retirement under this section dies prior to a determination by the board on the application for disability, the member shall be considered retired for service at the time of death, and any subsequent benefits shall be paid accordingly.

(g) If a member who applies for service retirement under this section dies after the board has approved the member’s application for disability, the member shall be considered a disabled member, or retired for disability, at the time of death, and any subsequent benefits shall be paid accordingly, even if the member died prior to
 receiving notification of the approval of their application for disability.

(h) If the member changes or cancels their service retirement application or terminates their service retirement allowance as described in subdivision (b), the system shall make appropriate adjustments to the applicable service retirement allowance, disability allowance, or disability retirement allowance, retroactive to the effective date of the disability allowance or disability retirement allowance. Subdivision (a) of Section 24617 shall not apply.

(i) The system may recover a service retirement allowance overpayment made to a member by deducting that overpayment from any subsequent disability benefit payable to the member.

(j) Nothing
 in this section shall be construed to allow a member or beneficiary to receive more than one type of retirement or disability allowance for the same period of time.

(k) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the website of the system no later than January 1, 2026.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   (SB 327)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on the date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.

(a) A member who retires for service after June 30, 1972, shall receive a retirement allowance consisting of both of the following:

(1) An annual allowance payable in monthly installments, upon retirement at normal retirement age but less than age 6014, equal to 2 percent of the final compensation for each year of credited service. If the member’s retirement is effective at less than normal retirement age and between early retirement age and normal retirement age, the member’s allowance shall be reduced by one-half of 1 percent for each full month, or fraction of a month that will
 elapse until the member will attain normal retirement age.

(2) An annuity that shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated annuity deposit contributions standing to the credit of the member’s account at the time of retirement.

(b) In computing the amounts described in subdivision (a), the age of the member on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue or such later date as provided in Section 24204 shall be used.

(c) The amendments to this section during the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not apply to state employees.

(d) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 19.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.5.

(a) A member who retires for service on or after January 1, 1999, shall receive a retirement allowance consisting of all of the following:

(1) An annual allowance payable in monthly installments, upon retirement equal to the percentage of the final compensation set forth opposite the member’s age at retirement in the following table multiplied by each year of credited service: Age at RetirementPercentage60 2.0060¼ 2.03360½ 2.06760¾ 2.1061 2.13361¼ 2.16761½ 2.2061¾ 2.23362 2.26762¼ 2.3062½ 2.33362¾ 2.36763 and over 2.40If the member’s retirement is effective at less than normal retirement age and between early retirement age and normal retirement age, the member’s allowance shall be reduced by one-half of 1 percent for each full month, or fraction of a month that will elapse until the member will attain normal retirement age.

(2) An annuity that shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member’s accumulated annuity deposit contributions at the time of retirement.

(3) An annuity based on the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account, pursuant to Section 25012, if elected by the member pursuant to Section 25011 or 25011.1.

(b) In computing the amounts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the age of the member on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue or the later date as described in Section 24204 shall be used.

(c) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 20.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.6.

(a) A member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 shall receive a retirement allowance consisting of all of the following:

(1) An annual allowance payable in monthly installments upon retirement equal to the percentage of the final compensation set forth opposite the member’s age at retirement in the following table multiplied by each year of credited service: Age at RetirementPercentage622.00062142.03362122.06762342.100632.13363142.16763122.20063342.233642.26764142.30064122.33364342.367652.400(2) If a member retires after attaining early retirement age but before attaining normal retirement age, the member’s allowance shall be reduced by one-half of 1 percent for each full month, or fraction of a month, that will elapse until the member will attain normal retirement age.

(b) In computing the amounts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the age of the member on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to be payable or the later date as described in Section 24204 shall be used.

(c) Creditable compensation used to calculate the
 defined benefit shall be limited as described in Section 22119.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 21.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, for a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013, the minimum retirement age shall be 55 years of age, the early retirement age shall be 55 years of age, and the normal retirement age shall be 62 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 22.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.8.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the system identify and propose all statutory changes necessary to fully effectuate the implementation of the changes established in Sections 24202.6 and 24202.7 in all relevant statutes by June 30, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 296, Sec. 5.   (AB 340)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24203.

(a) A member who has 30 years of credited service under this part may retire at age 50 years or older and receive an annual allowance equal to 2 percent of final compensation for each year of credited service. If the member has attained age 50 years, but has not attained early retirement age, the allowance shall be reduced by one-quarter of 1 percent for each full month or fraction of a month that will elapse until the member will attain early retirement age and one-half of 1 percent for each full month, or fraction of a month between early retirement age and normal retirement age.

(b) In computing the amounts described in subdivision (a), the age of the member on the last day of the
 month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue or any later date provided in Section 24204 shall be used.

(c) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 23.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24203.5.

(a) The percentage of final compensation used to compute the allowance pursuant to Section 24202.5, 24203, 24205, 24209, 24209.3, 24210, 24211, 24212, or 24213 of a member retiring on or after January 1, 1999, who has 30 or more years of credited service, shall be increased by two-tenths of 1 percentage point, provided that the sum of the percentage of final compensation used to compute the allowance, including any adjustments for retiring before the normal retirement age, and the additional percentage provided by this section does not exceed 2.40 percent.

(b) For purposes of establishing eligibility for the increased allowance pursuant to this section only, credited service shall
 exclude service credited pursuant to the following:

(1) Section 22714.

(2) Section 22715.

(3) Section 22717, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121.

(4) Section 22717.5.

(c) For purposes of establishing eligibility for the increased allowance pursuant to this section only, credited service shall include credited service that a court has ordered be awarded to a nonmember spouse pursuant to Section 22652. A nonmember spouse shall also be eligible for the increased allowance pursuant to this section if the member had 30 or more years of credited service on the date the
 parties separated, as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652.

(d) Nonqualified service credit for which contributions pursuant to Section 22826 were made in a lump sum on or after January 1, 2000, or for which the first installment was made on or after January 1, 2000, may not be included in determining the eligibility for an increased allowance pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 31.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24203.6.

(a) In addition to the amount otherwise payable pursuant to Section 24202.5, 24203, 24203.5, 24205, 24209, 24209.3, 24210, 24211, 24212, or 24213, a member shall receive an increase in the monthly allowance, prior to any modification pursuant to Sections 24300, 24300.1, and 24309, in the amount identified in subdivision (b), if the member meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The member retires for service on or after January 1, 2001.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2011, the member has 30 or more years of credited service, including any credited service that a court has ordered be awarded to a nonmember spouse pursuant to
 Section 22652, but excluding service credited pursuant to the following:

(A) Section 22714.

(B) Section 22715.

(C) Section 22717, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121.

(D) Section 22717.5.

(E) Section 22826.

(3) The member is receiving an allowance subject to Section 24203.5.

(b) The amount of the increase in the monthly allowance shall be based on the member’s years of credited service at the time of retirement as follows:30 years of credited service $20031 years of credited service $30032 or more years of credited service $400(c) This section also applies to a nonmember spouse, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The member is eligible for the allowance increase pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) upon his or her retirement for service.

(2) On the date the parties separated, as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652, the member had at least 30 years of credited service, excluding service credited pursuant to the following:

(A) Section 22714.

(B) Section 22715.

(C) Section 22717, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121.

(D) Section 22717.5.

(E) Section 22826.

(3) The service credit of the member was divided into separate accounts in the name of the member and the nonmember spouse by a court pursuant to Section 22652. The amount identified in the schedule in subdivision (b) and payable pursuant to this section, that is based on the service credited during the marriage, shall be divided and paid to the member and the nonmember spouse proportionately according to the respective percentages of the member’s service credit that were allocated to the member and the nonmember spouse in the court’s order.

(d) The allowance increase provided under this section is not subject to Sections 24415 and 24417, but is subject to Section 22140.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 32.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24203.8.

(a) For purposes of determining the allowance payable to a member employed by a community college prior to July 1, 1996, full time shall be defined pursuant to Section 22138.5 and pursuant to Section 20521 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as those provisions read on June 30, 1996, if application of that definition will increase the
 allowance payable to the member.

(b) For purposes of administering this section, the board shall have the authority to do both of the following:

(1) Establish and implement factors and assumptions necessary to calculate and compare the benefits payable to an eligible member. Those factors and assumptions may be based on information reported by the employer, including, but not
 limited to, all of the following:

(A) Base hours.

(B) Actual earnings.

(C) Annualized pay rate.

(2) Review
 calculations that were performed using the factors and assumptions described in paragraph (1). If the board determines that an employer failed to identify part-time service performed, the board shall consider that part-time service to be performed in a part-time lecture assignment as defined by the employer. If the board determines that the required information reported by the employer is inaccurate, incomplete, or the factors and assumptions were applied incorrectly, the board may recalculate the allowance payable to a member using additional factors and assumptions that may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Base hours.

(B) Actual
 earnings.

(C) Annualized pay rate.

(c) This section shall apply to a member employed by a community college prior to July 1, 1996, if the community college subsequently acts to reduce the minimum standard for full time as described in subdivision (c) of Section 22138.5 for the class of employees, and that community college provides written notice to the
 system of the act of the community college to reduce that minimum standard.

(d) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 17.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24204.

(a) A service retirement allowance under this part shall become effective upon any date designated by the member, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) An application for service retirement allowance is filed on a form provided by the system, which is executed no earlier than six months before the effective date of retirement allowance.

(2) The effective date of a member who files an application for retirement pursuant to Section 24201 is no earlier than
 270 calendar days prior to when the application for service retirement is received by the system.

(3) The effective date is later than the last day the member earned creditable compensation pursuant to Section 22119.2 or 22119.3.

(4) The effective date is no earlier than one day after the date on which the retirement allowance was terminated under Section 24208.

(5) The effective date is no earlier than one year following the date on which the retirement allowance was terminated under subdivision (a) of Section 24117.

(6) The
 effective date is no earlier than the date upon and continuously after which the member is determined to the satisfaction of the board to have been mentally incompetent.

(7) The effective date is no earlier than one day after the date upon which the member completes payment of a service credit purchase pursuant to Section 22801, 22820, or 22826, or payment of a redeposit of contributions pursuant to Section 23200, except as provided in Section 22801 or 22829.

(b) A member who files an application for service retirement may change or cancel their retirement application if all of the following are met: 

(1) The form provided by the system is received by the system no
 later than 30 days from the date the member’s initial benefit payment for the member’s most recent retirement under the Defined Benefit Program is paid by the system.

(2) The member returns the total gross distribution amount of all payments for any canceled benefit, including a lump-sum payment being changed to an annuity, to the system no later than 45 days from the date of the member’s initial benefit payment. The member shall be liable for any adverse tax consequences that may result from these actions.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a member to receive more than one type of retirement or disability allowance for the same period of time by virtue of the member’s own membership.

(d) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the website of the system no later than January 1, 2026.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 708, Sec. 4.   (SB 327)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative on the date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24205.

A member retiring prior to 60 years of age, and who has attained 55 years of age, may elect to receive one-half of the service retirement allowance for normal retirement age for a limited time and then revert to the full retirement allowance for normal retirement age.

(a) The retirement allowance shall be based on service credit and final compensation as of the date of retirement for service and shall be calculated with the factor for normal retirement age.

(b) If the member elects a joint and survivor option under Section 24300 or 24300.1, the actuarial reduction shall be based on the member’s and beneficiary’s ages as of the effective date of the
 early retirement. If the member elected a preretirement option under Section 24307, the actuarial reduction shall be based on the member’s and beneficiary’s ages as determined by the provisions of that section.

(c) One-half of the retirement allowance as of 60 years of age shall be paid for a period of time equal to twice the elapsed time between the effective date of retirement and the date of the retired member’s 60th birthday.

(d) The full retirement allowance as calculated under subdivision (a) or (b) shall begin to accrue as of the first of the month following the reduction period as specified in subdivision (c). The full retirement allowance shall not begin to accrue prior to this time under any circumstances, including, but not limited to, divorce or death of the named
 beneficiary.

(e) The annual improvement factor provided for in Sections 22140 and 22141 shall be based upon the retirement allowance as calculated under subdivision (a) or (b). The improvement factor shall begin to accrue on September 1 following the retired member’s 60th birthday. These increases shall be accumulated and shall become payable when the full retirement allowance for normal retirement age first becomes payable.

(f) Any ad hoc benefit increase with an effective date prior to the retired member’s 60th birthday shall not affect an allowance payable under this section. Only those ad hoc improvements with effective dates on or after the retired member’s 60th birthday shall be accrued and accumulated and shall first become payable when the full retirement allowance for
 normal retirement age becomes payable.

(g) The cancellation of an option election in accordance with Section 24322 shall not cancel the election under this section. Upon cancellation of the joint and survivor option, one-half of the retired member’s retirement allowance as calculated under subdivision (a) shall become payable for the balance of the reduction period specified in subdivision (c).

(h) If a retired member who has elected a joint and survivor option dies during the period when the reduced allowance is payable, the beneficiary shall receive one-half of the allowance payable to the beneficiary until the date when the retired member would have received the full retirement allowance for normal retirement age. At that time, the beneficiary’s allowance shall be increased
 to the full amount payable to the beneficiary plus the appropriate annual improvement factor increases and ad hoc increases.

(i) This section shall not apply to a member who retires for service pursuant to Section 24201.5, 24209, 24209.3, 24210, 24211, or 24212.

(j) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 34.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24206.

The minimum unmodified allowance for service retirement under the Defined Benefit Program, exclusive of annuities payable from accumulated annuity deposit contributions and exclusive of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account, shall not be less than ten dollars ($10) per month multiplied by the member’s years of credited service. This guaranteed amount shall be reduced by the amount of an unmodified allowance payable from a local system based on service credited under the Defined Benefit Program. If the retirement is effective at less than normal retirement age this allowance shall be reduced by one-half of 1 percent for each full month or fraction of a month that will elapse until the member would have reached normal retirement
 age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 25.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

24207.

If a retired member terminates a service retirement allowance and subsequently retires under this part, the minimum retirement allowance shall be the allowance provided by Section 24206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24208.

(a) A member retired for service under this part may terminate the retirement allowance payable under this part and applicable to his or her credited service upon written request to the system effective upon a date designated by the member, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The request for termination of the retirement allowance is filed on a form provided by the system, and the form is executed no earlier than six months before the effective date of the termination.

(2) The effective date of the termination of the retirement allowance is no earlier than the first day of the month in which the request for
 termination is received in the system’s headquarters office or no earlier than one day after the benefit effective date of the most recent retirement, whichever is later.

(b) A member who files a request for termination of the retirement allowance may cancel or change the termination upon written request to the system. The request for cancellation or change must be on a form provided by the system and shall be received in the system’s headquarters office no later than the last day of the month in which the request for termination to be canceled or changed is effective.

(c) A member whose retirement allowance is terminated pursuant to this section may apply for retirement pursuant to Section 24209 or Section 24209.3, in accordance with Section 24204.

(d) A member whose retirement allowance is terminated pursuant to this section may not file a preretirement election of an
 option pursuant to Section 24307 within one year of reinstatement that elects either a different option or a different beneficiary or set of beneficiaries, or both, than were in effect at the time the retirement allowance was terminated.

(e) A member whose retirement allowance is terminated pursuant to this section and retires pursuant to Section 24209 with a benefit effective date within one year of reinstatement shall elect the same option and beneficiary or beneficiaries that were in effect at the time the retirement allowance was terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 12.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24209.

(a) Upon retirement for service following reinstatement, the member shall receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of both of the following:

(1) An amount equal to the monthly allowance the member was eligible to receive immediately preceding the most recent reinstatement, exclusive of any amounts payable pursuant to Section 22714 or 22715, increased by the improvement factor that would have been applied to the allowance if the member had not reinstated.

(2) An amount calculated pursuant to Section 24202, 24202.5, 24202.6, 24203, 24203.5, or 24206 based on credited service accrued, including any service
 granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation.

(b) If the total amount of credited service accrued, other than that accrued pursuant to Sections 22714, 22715, 22717, 22717.5, and 22826, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121, is equal to or greater than 30 years, the amounts identified in paragraphs (1), for members who initially retired on or after January 1, 1999, and (2) of subdivision (a) shall be calculated pursuant to Section 24203.5.

(c) If the total amount of credited service accrued, other than that accrued pursuant to Sections 22714, 22715, 22717, 22717.5, and 22826, except as
 provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121, is equal to or greater than 30 years, upon retirement for service following reinstatement, a member who retired pursuant to Section 24213, and received the terminated disability allowance for the prior retirement, shall receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of the following:

(1) An amount based on the credited service accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, prior to the effective date of the disability allowance, the member’s age at the prior retirement increased by the factor provided in Section 24203.5, and projected final compensation.

(2) An amount calculated pursuant to Section 24202, 24202.5, 24202.6, 24203.5, or 24206 based on credited service accrued, including any service
 granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, subsequent to the reinstatement, the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a combination of both.

(d) Benefits calculated pursuant to this section shall not take into consideration the benefit comparison described in Section 24203.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 18.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24209.3.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 24209, and exclusive of any amounts payable during the prior retirement for service pursuant to Section 22714, or 22715:

(1) A member who retired, other than pursuant to Section 24210, 24211, 24212, or 24213, and who reinstates and performs creditable service, as defined in Section 22119.5, after the most recent reinstatement, in an amount equal to two or more years of credited service, shall, upon retirement for service on or after the effective date of this section, receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of the following:

(A) An amount calculated pursuant to
 this chapter based on credited service accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, prior to the most recent reinstatement, using the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation.

(B) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, using the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation.

(2) A member who retired pursuant to Section 24210 and who reinstates and performs creditable service, as defined in Section 22119.5,
 after the most recent reinstatement, in an amount equal to two or more years of credited service, shall, upon retirement for service on or after the effective date of this section, receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of the following:

(A) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, prior to the effective date of the disability retirement, using the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and indexed final compensation to the effective date of the initial service retirement.

(B) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on the credited service
 accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, after termination of the disability retirement, excluding credited service accrued or granted subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, using the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation.

(C) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued, including any service granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5, subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, using the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation.

(3) A member who retired pursuant to Section 24211 and who reinstates
 and performs creditable service, as defined in Section 22119.5, after the most recent reinstatement, in an amount equal to two or more years of credited service, shall, upon retirement for service on or after the effective date of this section, receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of the following:

(A) The greater of (i) the disability allowance the member was eligible to receive immediately prior to termination of that allowance, excluding the children’s portion, or (ii) an amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued prior to the effective date of the disability allowance, excluding credited service accrued or granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section
 23200), using the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation earnable, or a combination of both.

(B) An amount equal to either of the following:

(i) For a member who was receiving a benefit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24211, an amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued at the time of the retirement pursuant to Section 24211, excluding credited service accrued or granted prior to the effective date of the disability allowance or pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with
 Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a combination of both.

(ii) For a member who was receiving a benefit pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 24211, an amount calculated pursuant
 to this chapter based on projected service at the time of the retirement pursuant to Section 24211, excluding credited service accrued or granted prior to the effective date of the disability allowance or pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a combination of both.

(C) An amount based on any credited service accrued or granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820)
 or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), at the time of the retirement pursuant to Section 24211, using the
 member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a combination of both.

(D) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, including credited service accrued or granted pursuant to Section 22714, 22715, 22717, or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), using the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a
 combination of both.

(4) A member who retired pursuant to Section 24212 or 24213 and who reinstates and performs creditable service, as defined in Section 22119.5, after the most recent reinstatement, in an amount equal to two or more years of credited service, shall, upon retirement for service on or after the effective date of this section, receive a service retirement allowance equal to the sum of the following:

(A) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on the member’s projected service at the time of the retirement pursuant to Section 24212 or 24213, including credited service accrued or granted pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with
 Section 23200), using the member’s age at the subsequent service retirement, from which age shall be deducted the total time during which the member was retired for service, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation, or a combination of both.

(B) An amount calculated pursuant to this chapter based on credited service accrued subsequent to the most recent reinstatement, including credited service accrued or granted pursuant to Section 22714, 22715, 22717, or 22717.5 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) or Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200), using the member’s age on the last day of the month in which the retirement allowance begins to accrue, and final compensation using compensation earnable, or projected final compensation,
 or a combination of both.
